Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF528.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1089HV (1) 91 th/ns H.F. 528 Section 1. Section 321.277, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. A person who drives any a vehicle in such manner as 3 to indicate either a willful or a wanton disregard for the 4 safety of persons or property , including but not limited to by 5 exceeding a speed limit by twenty-five miles per hour or more, 6 is guilty of reckless driving. 7